District of Columbia statutes.
47-2706

Misrepresenting merchandise.

Any person selling or offering for sale any property under the provisions of this subchapter shall, in describing the same, be truthful with respect to the character, quality, kind, and description of the same and which, for the purpose hereof, shall be considered as warranties, and any breach of the same shall be punishable by prosecution in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, as hereinbefore set forth.

History

Sept. 8, 1916, 39 Stat. 847, ch. 473, § 6
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2706.
1973 Ed., § 47-2206.